Georgia, session 2025_26, HB584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
19 PART I
20 Drug Abuse Treatment and Education Programs and Narcotic Treatment Programs
21 SECTION 1-1.
22 Title 26 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to food, drugs, and cosmetics,
23 is amended in Chapter 5, relating to drug abuse treatment and education programs, by
24 revising Code Section 26-5-3, relating to definitions, as follows:
25 "26-5-3.
26 As used in this article, the term:
27 (1) 'Department' means the Department of Community Behavioral Health and
28 Developmental Disabilities or its successor.
29 (2) 'Drug abuse treatment and education program' means any system of treatment or
30 therapeutic advice or counsel provided for the rehabilitation of drug dependent persons
31 and shall include programs offered in the following types of facilities:
32 (A) Residential care centers. A facility staffed by professional and paraprofessional
33 persons offering treatment or therapeutic programs for drug dependent persons who live
34 on the premises; and
35 (B) Nonresidential care centers. A non-live-in facility, staffed by professional and
36 paraprofessional persons, offering treatment or therapeutic programs for drug
37 dependent persons who do not live on the premises.
38 (3) 'Drug dependent person' means a person who is in imminent danger of becoming
39 dependent upon or addicted to the use of drugs or who habitually lacks self-control as to
40 the use of drugs or who uses drugs to the extent that his or her health is substantially
41 impaired or endangered or his or her social or economic function is substantially
42 disrupted.
- 2 -

25 LC 57 0270S
43 (4) 'Drugs' means any substance defined as a drug by federal or Georgia law or any other
44 chemical substance which may be used in lieu of a drug to obtain similar effects, with the
45 exception of alcohol and its derivatives.
46 (5) 'Governing body' means the county board of health community service board, the
47 partnership, the corporation, the association, or the person or group of persons who
48 maintains and controls the program and who is legally responsible for the operation.
49 (6) 'License' means the official permit issued by the director department which authorizes
50 the holder to operate a drug abuse treatment and education program for the term provided
51 therein.
52 (7) 'Licensee' means any person holding a license or provisional license issued by the
53 director department under this article.
54 (8) 'Program' means the drug abuse treatment and education program."
55 SECTION 1-2.
56 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 26-5-6, relating to
57 promulgation of rules and regulations, as follows:
58 "26-5-6.
59 The department is authorized and directed to create and promulgate all rules and
60 regulations necessary for the implementation of this article. Any rule and regulation
61 created by the Department of Community Health and in effect on December 31, 2025, shall
62 continue to be in effect and shall be enforceable by the department until such time as such
63 rule or regulation is amended or revoked by the department."
64 SECTION 1-3.
65 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 26-5-7, relating to
66 license required, as follows:
- 3 -

25 LC 57 0270S
67 "26-5-7.
68 No governing body shall operate a drug abuse treatment and education program without
69 having a valid license or provisional license issued pursuant to this article. Any license or
70 provisional license issued to a program by the Department of Community Health on
71 December 31, 2025, shall be valid until revoked or renewed by the department, surrendered
72 by the licensee, or otherwise terminated."
73 SECTION 1-4.
74 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 26-5-10, relating to
75 issuance of license and revocation of suspension, as follows:
76 "26-5-10.
77 (a) The department may, upon submission of an application, with proof of accreditation
78 by a voluntary accreditation agency approved by the department, issue a license based upon
79 the findings of the accreditation agency. The Such license may be issued without an
80 on-site visit by the department representative. Any denial, suspension, or revocation of the
81 voluntary accreditation agency shall result in an automatic revocation or suspension of the
82 license issued under pursuant to this Code section, and the holder must apply licensee shall
83 reapply for a new license as provided for in this article.
84 (b) The department shall not be bound by any policy or practice of the Department of
85 Community Health in effect on December 31, 2025, in determining whether to issue a
86 license based on the findings of an accreditation agency pursuant to subsection (a) of this
87 Code section."
88 SECTION 1-5.
89 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 26-5-23, relating to
90 publication of annual report, as follows:
- 4 -

25 LC 57 0270S
91 "26-5-23.
92 The Department of Community Health and the Department of Behavioral Health and
93 Developmental Disabilities department shall publish an annual report using data from the
94 department's central registry data base on the number of patients in enrolled treatment, the
95 number of patients discharged from treatment, each patient's state of residence, and any
96 other information as determined by the departments department. Such published report
97 shall exclude patient identifying information and be compliant with state and federal laws."
98 SECTION 1-6.
99 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 26-5-41, relating to
100 definitions regarding enforcement of narcotic treatment programs, as follows:
101 "26-5-41.
102 As used in this article, the term:
103 (1) 'Department' means the Department of Community Behavioral Health and
104 Developmental Disabilities or its successor.
105 (2) 'Governing body' means the county board of health community service board, the
106 partnership, the corporation, the association, or the person or group of persons who
107 maintains and controls a narcotic treatment program, who is legally responsible for its
108 operation, and who holds the license or provisional license to operate that program.
109 (3) 'License' means the official permit issued by the department that authorizes the holder
110 to operate a narcotic treatment program for the term provided therein.
111 (4) 'Licensee' means any person holding a license or provisional license issued by the
112 department under this article.
113 (5) 'Narcotic treatment program' means any system of treatment provided for chronic
114 heroin or opiate-like drug-dependent individuals that administers narcotic drugs under
115 physicians' orders either for detoxification purposes or for maintenance treatment in a
116 rehabilitative context offered by any county board of health community service board,
- 5 -

25 LC 57 0270S
117 partnership, corporation, association, or person or groups of persons engaged in such
118 administration.
119 (6) 'Patient' means any individual who undergoes treatment in a narcotic treatment
120 program."
121 SECTION 1-7.
122 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 26-5-43, relating to
123 rules and regulations, as follows:
124 "26-5-43.
125 The department is authorized and directed to create and promulgate all rules and
126 regulations necessary for the implementation of this article. Any rule and regulation
127 created by the Department of Community Health and in effect on December 31, 2025, shall
128 continue to be in effect and shall be enforceable by the department until such time as such
129 rule or regulation is amended or revoked by the department."
130 SECTION 1-8.
131 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 26-5-44, relating to
132 license required, as follows:
133 "26-5-44.
134 No governing body shall operate a narcotic treatment program without having a valid
135 license or provisional license issued pursuant to this article. Any license or provisional
136 license issued to a narcotic treatment program by the Department of Community Health on
137 December 31, 2025, shall be valid until revoked or renewed by the department, surrendered
138 by the licensee, or otherwise terminated."
- 6 -

25 LC 57 0270S
139 SECTION 1-9.
140 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising subsection (a) of Code Section
141 26-5-47, relating to application review and requirements and nontransferability, as follows:
142 "(a) The department shall, consistent with the requirements of this Code section, establish
143 an application review process committee. The members of the committee shall include
144 representation from department staff members and the Department of Behavioral Health
145 and Developmental Disabilities."
146 SECTION 1-10.
147 Said title is further amended in said chapter by revising Code Section 26-5-56, relating to
148 confidentiality of patient information, as follows:
149 "26-5-56.
150 (a) For the purpose of providing more effective treatment and rehabilitation, the records
151 and name of any drug dependent person who seeks or obtains treatment, therapeutic advice,
152 or counsel from any program licensed under this chapter shall be confidential and shall not
153 be revealed except to the extent authorized in writing by the drug dependent person
154 affected; furthermore, any. Any communication by such drug dependent person to an
155 authorized employee of any holder of a license any licensee shall be deemed confidential;
156 provided, however, that, except for matters privileged under other laws of this state, the
157 records of such person and information about such person shall be produced in response
158 to a valid court order of any court of competent jurisdiction after a full and fair show-cause
159 hearing and in response to a departmental request for access for licensing purposes when
160 such request is accompanied by a written statement that no record of patient identifying
161 information will be made.
162 (b) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prevent the department from
163 operating a central registry pursuant to Code Section 26-5-60, and nothing in this Code
164 section shall prevent or inhibit narcotic treatment programs from providing the department
- 7 -

25 LC 57 0270S
165 with requested information for the purpose of maintaining such central registry or for
166 maintaining any other registry or database as required by federal law or regulation."
167 PART II
168 Departmental Reassignment
169 SECTION 2-1.
170 Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to health, is amended by revising
171 subsection (d) of Code Section 31-2-4, relating to the department's powers, duties, functions,
172 and responsibilities, divisions, directors, and contracts for health benefits, as follows:
173 "(d) In addition to its other powers, duties, and functions, the department:
174 (1) Shall be the lead agency in coordinating and purchasing health care benefit plans for
175 state and public employees, dependents, and retirees and may also coordinate with the
176 board of regents for the purchase and administration of such health care benefit plans for
177 its members, employees, dependents, and retirees;
178 (2) Is authorized to plan and coordinate medical education and physician work force
179 issues;
180 (3) Shall investigate the lack of availability of health insurance coverage and the issues
181 associated with the uninsured population of this state. In particular, the department is
182 authorized to investigate the feasibility of creating and administering insurance programs
183 for small businesses and political subdivisions of the state and to propose cost-effective
184 solutions to reducing the numbers of uninsured in this state;
185 (4) Is authorized to appoint a health care work force policy advisory committee to
186 oversee and coordinate work force planning activities;
187 (5) Is authorized to solicit and accept donations, contributions, and gifts and receive,
188 hold, and use grants, devises, and bequests of real, personal, and mixed property on
189 behalf of the state to enable the department to carry out its functions and purposes;
- 8 -

25 LC 57 0270S
190 (6) Is authorized to award grants, as funds are available, to hospital authorities, hospitals,
191 and medical-legal partnerships for public health purposes, pursuant to Code Sections
192 31-7-94 and 31-7-94.1 and paragraph (11) of this subsection;
193 (7) Shall make provision for meeting the cost of hospital care of persons eligible for
194 public assistance to the extent that federal matching funds are available for such
195 expenditures for hospital care. To accomplish this purpose, the department is authorized
196 to pay from funds appropriated for such purposes the amount required under this
197 paragraph into a trust fund account which shall be available for disbursement for the cost
198 of hospital care of public assistance recipients. The commissioner, subject to the
199 approval of the Office of Planning and Budget, on the basis of the funds appropriated in
200 any year, shall estimate the scope of hospital care available to public assistance recipients
201 and the approximate per capita cost of such care. Monthly payments into the trust fund
202 for hospital care shall be made on behalf of each public assistance recipient and such
203 payments shall be deemed encumbered for assistance payable. Ledger accounts
204 reflecting payments into and out of the hospital care fund shall be maintained for each of
205 the categories of public assistance established under Code Section 49-4-3. The balance
206 of state funds in such trust fund for the payment of hospital costs in an amount not to
207 exceed the amount of federal funds held in the trust fund by the department available for
208 expenditure under this paragraph shall be deemed encumbered and held in trust for the
209 payment of the costs of hospital care and shall be rebudgeted for this purpose on each
210 quarterly budget required under the laws governing the expenditure of state funds. The
211 state auditor shall audit the funds in the trust fund established under this paragraph in the
212 same manner that any other funds disbursed by the department are audited;
213 (8) Shall classify and license community living arrangements in accordance with the
214 rules and regulations promulgated by the department for the licensing and enforcement
215 of licensing requirements for persons whose services are financially supported, in whole
216 or in part, by funds authorized through the Department of Behavioral Health and
- 9 -

25 LC 57 0270S
217 Developmental Disabilities. To be eligible for licensing as a community living
218 arrangement, the residence and services provided must be integrated within the local
219 community. All community living arrangements licensed by the department shall be
220 subject to the provisions of Code Sections 31-2-8 and 31-7-2.2. No person, business
221 entity, corporation, or association, whether operated for profit or not for profit, may
222 operate a community living arrangement without first obtaining a license or provisional
223 license from the department. A license issued pursuant to this paragraph is not assignable
224 or transferable. As used in this paragraph, the term 'community living arrangement'
225 means any residence, whether operated for profit or not, which undertakes through its
226 ownership or management to provide or arrange for the provision of housing, food, one
227 or more personal services, support, care, or treatment exclusively for two or more persons
228 who are not related to the owner or administrator of the residence by blood or marriage;
229 (9)(8) Shall establish, by rule adopted pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia
230 Administrative Procedure Act,' a schedule of fees for licensure activities for institutions
231 and other health care related entities required to be licensed, permitted, registered,
232 certificated, or commissioned by the department pursuant to Chapter 7, 13, 23, or 44 of
233 this title, Chapter 5 of Title 26, paragraph (8) of this subsection, or Article 7 of Chapter
234 6 of Title 49. Such schedules shall be determined in a manner so as to help defray the
235 costs incurred by the department, but in no event to exceed such costs, both direct and
236 indirect, in providing such licensure activities. Such fees may be annually adjusted by
237 the department but shall not be increased by more than the annual rate of inflation as
238 measured by the Consumer Price Index, as reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of
239 the United States Department of Labor. All fees paid thereunder shall be paid into the
240 general funds of the State of Georgia. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the
241 proceeds from all fees imposed pursuant to this paragraph be used to support and improve
242 the quality of licensing services provided by the department;
- 10 -

25 LC 57 0270S
243 (10)(A)(9)(A) May accept the certification or accreditation of an entity or program by
244 a certification or accreditation body, in accordance with specific standards, as evidence
245 of compliance by the entity or program with the substantially equivalent departmental
246 requirements for issuance or renewal of a permit or provisional permit, provided that
247 such certification or accreditation is established prior to the issuance or renewal of such
248 permits. The department may not require an additional departmental inspection of any
249 entity or program whose certification or accreditation has been accepted by the
250 department, except to the extent that such specific standards are less rigorous or less
251 comprehensive than departmental requirements. Nothing in this Code section shall
252 prohibit either departmental inspections for violations of such standards or requirements
253 or the revocation of or refusal to issue or renew permits, as authorized by applicable
254 law, or for violation of any other applicable law or regulation pursuant thereto.
255 (B) For purposes of this paragraph, the term:
256 (i) 'Entity or program' means an agency, center, facility, institution, community living
257 arrangement, drug abuse treatment and education program, or entity subject to
258 regulation by the department under Chapters 7, 13, 22, 23, and 44 of this title;
259 Chapter 5 of Title 26; paragraph (8) of this subsection; and Article 7 of Chapter 6 of
260 Title 49.
261 (ii) 'Permit' means any license, permit, registration, certificate, or commission issued
262 by the department pursuant to the provisions of the law cited in division (i) of this
263 subparagraph;
264 (11)(A)(10)(A) Is authorized to approve medical-legal partnerships that comply with
265 standards and guidelines established for such programs for purposes of determining
266 eligibility for grants. The department shall seek input from legal services organizations,
267 community health advocacy organizations, hospitals, diagnostic and treatment centers,
268 and other primary and specialty health care providers in establishing such standards and
269 guidelines.
- 11 -

25 LC 57 0270S
270 (B) For purposes of this paragraph, the term 'medical-legal partnership' means a
271 program conducted or established by a nonprofit entity through a collaboration pursuant
272 to a written agreement between one or more medical service providers and one or more
273 legal services programs, including those based within a law school, to provide legal
274 services without charge to assist income-eligible individuals and their families in
275 resolving legal matters or other needs that have an impact on the health of such
276 individuals and families. Written agreements may include a memorandum of
277 understanding or other agreement relating to the operations of the partnership and
278 encompassing the rights and responsibilities of each party thereto. The medical service
279 provider or providers may provide referrals of its patients to the legal services program
280 or programs on matters that may potentially impact the health, health care, or the health
281 care costs of a patient.
282 (C) A medical-legal partnership that complies with the standards and guidelines
283 established pursuant to this paragraph and has demonstrated the ability and experience
284 to provide high quality patient centered legal services regarding legal matters or other
285 needs that have an impact on the health of individuals and families shall be approved
286 by the department.
287 (D) This paragraph shall not be construed to require any medical-legal partnership or
288 similar entity to seek or attain approval pursuant to this paragraph in order to operate;
289 (12)(11) In cooperation with the Department of Corrections and the State Board of
290 Pardons and Paroles, shall establish and implement a Medicaid eligibility determination
291 procedure so that inmates being considered for parole who are eligible for long-term care
292 services may apply for Medicaid; and
293 (13)(12) Shall request federal approval for and facilitate the application of certificates
294 of need for facilities capable of providing long-term care services, with Medicaid as the
295 primary funding source, to inmates who are eligible for such services and funding upon
- 12 -

25 LC 57 0270S
296 his or her release from a public institution, as such term is defined in Code Section
297 49-4-31."
298 SECTION 2-2.
299 Said title is further amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 31-2-8, relating to
300 actions against certain applicants or licensees, as follows:
301 "(a) This Code section shall be applicable to any agency, center, facility, institution,
302 community living arrangement, drug abuse treatment and education program, or entity
303 subject to regulation by the department under Chapters 7, 13, 22, 23, and 44 of this title;
304 Chapter 5 of Title 26; paragraph (8) of subsection (d) of Code Section 31-2-4; and Article
305 7 of Chapter 6 of Title 49. For purposes of this Code section, the term 'license' shall be
306 used to refer to any license, permit, registration, or commission issued by the department
307 pursuant to the provisions of the law cited in this subsection."
308 SECTION 2-3.
309 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 31-7-2.2, relating to determination that
310 patients or residents in an institution, community living arrangement, or treatment program
311 are in danger, relocation of patients or residents, and suspension of admissions, as follows:
312 "31-7-2.2.
313 (a)(1) The commissioner may order the emergency relocation of patients or residents
314 from an institution subject to licensure under this chapter, a community living
315 arrangement subject to licensure under paragraph (8) of subsection (d) of Code Section
316 31-2-4, or a drug abuse treatment and education program subject to licensure under
317 Chapter 5 of Title 26 when the commissioner he or she has determined that the patients
318 or residents are subject to an imminent and substantial danger.
319 (2) When an order is issued under this subsection, the commissioner shall provide for:
- 13 -

25 LC 57 0270S
320 (A) Notice to the patient or resident, his or her next of kin or guardian, and his or her
321 physician of the emergency relocation and the reasons therefor;
322 (B) Relocation to the nearest appropriate institution, community living arrangement,
323 or drug abuse treatment and education program; and
324 (C) Other protection designed to ensure the welfare and, when possible, the desires of
325 the patient or resident.
326 (b)(1) The commissioner may order the emergency placement of a monitor in an
327 institution subject to licensure under this chapter, a community living arrangement
328 subject to licensure under paragraph (8) of subsection (d) of Code Section 31-2-4, or a
329 drug abuse treatment and education program subject to licensure under Chapter 5 of
330 Title 26 when one or more of the following conditions are present:
331 (A) The institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and
332 education program is operating without a permit or a license;
333 (B) The department has denied application for a permit or a license or has initiated
334 action to revoke the existing permit or license of the institution, community living
335 arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program;
336 (C) The institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and
337 education program is closing or plans to close and adequate arrangements for relocation
338 of the patients or residents have not been made at least 30 days before the date of
339 closure; or
340 (D) The health, safety, security, rights, or welfare of the patients or residents cannot
341 be adequately assured by the institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse
342 treatment and education program.
343 (2) A monitor may be placed, pursuant to this subsection, in an institution, community
344 living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program for no more than ten
345 days, during which time the monitor shall observe conditions and compliance with any
346 recommended remedial action of the department by the institution, community living
- 14 -

25 LC 57 0270S
347 arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program. The monitor shall report
348 to the department. The monitor shall not assume any administrative responsibility within
349 the institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education
350 program nor shall the monitor be liable for any actions of the institution, community
351 living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program. The costs of placing
352 a monitor in an institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and
353 education program shall be paid by the institution, community living arrangement, or
354 drug abuse treatment and education program unless the order placing the monitor is
355 determined to be invalid in a contested case proceeding under subsection (d) of this Code
356 section, in which event the costs shall be paid by the state.
357 (c)(1) The commissioner may order the emergency prohibition of admissions to an
358 institution subject to licensure under this chapter, a community living arrangement
359 subject to licensure under paragraph (8) of subsection (d) of Code Section 31-2-4, or
360 program subject to licensure under Chapter 5 of Title 26 when such institution,
361 community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program has failed
362 to correct a violation of departmental permit rules or regulations within a reasonable
363 period of time, as specified in the department's corrective order, and the violation:
364 (A) Could jeopardize the health and safety of the residents or patients in the institution,
365 community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program if
366 allowed to remain uncorrected; or
367 (B) Is a repeat violation over a 12 month period, which is intentional or due to gross
368 negligence.
369 (2) Admission to an institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment
370 and education program may be suspended until the violation has been corrected or until
371 the department has determined that the institution, community living arrangement, or
372 drug abuse treatment and education program has undertaken the action necessary to effect
373 correction of the violation.
- 15 -

25 LC 57 0270S
374 (d) The commissioner may issue emergency orders pursuant to this Code section only if
375 authorized by rules and regulations of the department. Unless otherwise provided in the
376 order, an emergency order shall become effective immediately. The department shall hold
377 a preliminary hearing within ten days following a request therefor by any institution,
378 community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program affected
379 by an emergency order. If, at the preliminary hearing, the order is determined by the
380 department to be invalid, that order shall thereupon become void and of no effect. If, at the
381 preliminary hearing, the order is determined by the department to be valid, that
382 determination shall constitute a contested case under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia
383 Administrative Procedure Act,' and that order shall remain in effect until determined
384 invalid in a proceeding regarding the contested case or until rescinded by the
385 commissioner, whichever is earlier. For purposes of this subsection, an emergency order
386 is valid only if the order is authorized to be issued under this Code section and rules and
387 regulations relating thereto.
388 (e) The powers provided by this Code section are cumulative of all other powers of the
389 department, board, and commissioner."
390 SECTION 2-4.
391 Said title is further amended by revising paragraph (3) of Code Section 31-7-430, relating
392 to definitions relative to designated essential caregivers, as follows:
393 "(3) 'Long-term care facility' means a skilled nursing home, intermediate care home,
394 personal care home, assisted living community, community living arrangement, or
395 inpatient hospice facility licensed or permitted to operate pursuant to this chapter and any
396 community living arrangement licensed by the Department of Behavioral Health and
397 Developmental Disabilities pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 13 of Title 37."
398 SECTION 2-5.
- 16 -

25 LC 57 0270S
399 Said title is further amended by revising paragraph (3) of Code Section 31-8-81, relating to
400 definitions relative to reporting abuse or exploitation, as follows:
401 "(3) 'Long-term care facility' or 'facility' means any skilled nursing home, intermediate
402 care home, assisted living community, or personal care home, or community living
403 arrangement now or hereafter subject to regulation and licensure by the department."
404 PART III
405 Departmental Regulation of Licensed Programs
406 SECTION 3-1.
407 Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to mental health, is amended by
408 adding a new article to Chapter 2, relating to administration of mental health, developmental
409 disabilities, addictive disabilities, and other disability services, to read as follows:
410 "ARTICLE 3
411 37-2-70.
412 (a) As used in this article, the term:
413 (1) 'Adult residential mental health program' means a program licensed by the
414 department under Article 7 of Chapter 3 of this title.
415 (2) 'Applicant' means any individual affiliated with a partnership, corporation,
416 association, or individuals or groups of individuals submitting an application to operate
417 an adult residential mental health program, community living arrangement, drug abuse
418 treatment and education program, or narcotic treatment program.
419 (3) 'Community living arrangement' means a group home licensed by the department
420 under Chapter 13 of this title.
- 17 -

25 LC 57 0270S
421 (4) 'Drug abuse treatment and education program' means a treatment program licensed
422 by the department under Article 1 of Chapter 5 of Title 26.
423 (5) 'License' means the official permit issued by the department on or after January 1,
424 2026; provided, however, that such term shall also include an official permit issued by
425 the Department of Community Health on December 31, 2025.
426 (6) 'Licensee' means any person holding a license issued by the department to operate an
427 adult residential mental health program, community living arrangement, drug abuse
428 treatment and education program, or narcotic treatment program.
429 (7) 'Narcotic treatment program' means a treatment program licensed by the department
430 under Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 26.
431 37-2-71.
432 The department shall establish by rule adopted pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the
433 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,' a schedule of fees for licensure activities for adult
434 residential mental health programs, community living arrangements, drug treatment and
435 education programs, and narcotic treatment programs required to be licensed by the
436 department. Such schedules shall be determined in a manner so as to help defray the costs
437 incurred by the department, but in no event to exceed such costs, both direct and indirect,
438 in providing such licensure activities. Such fees may be annually adjusted by the
439 department but shall not be increased by more than the annual rate of inflation as measured
440 by the Consumer Price Index as reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United
441 States Department of Labor. All fees paid thereunder shall be paid into the general fund
442 of the State of Georgia. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the proceeds from all
443 fees imposed pursuant to this Code section be used to support and improve the quality of
444 licensing services provided by the department.
445 37-2-72.
- 18 -

25 LC 57 0270S
446 (a) The department shall have the authority to take any of the actions enumerated in
447 subsection (b) of this Code section upon a finding that the applicant or licensee has:
448 (1) Knowingly made any false statement of material information in connection with the
449 application for a license, or in statements made or on documents submitted to the
450 department as part of an inspection, survey, or investigation, or in the alteration or
451 falsification of records maintained by the adult residential mental health program,
452 community living arrangement, drug treatment and education program, or narcotic
453 treatment program;
454 (2) Failed or refused to provide the department with access to the premises subject to
455 regulation or information pertinent to the initial or continued licensing of the adult
456 residential mental health program, community living arrangement, drug treatment and
457 education program, or narcotic treatment program;
458 (3) Failed to comply with the licensing requirements of this state; or
459 (4) Failed to comply with any provision of this Code section.
460 (b) When the department finds that any applicant or licensee has violated any provision
461 of subsection (a) of this Code section or laws, rules, regulations, or formal orders related
462 to the initial or continued licensing of an adult residential mental health program,
463 community living arrangement, drug treatment and education program, or narcotic
464 treatment program, the department, subject to notice and opportunity for hearing, may take
465 any of the following actions:
466 (1) Refuse to grant a license; provided, however, that the department may refuse to grant
467 a license without holding a hearing prior to taking such action;
468 (2) Administer a public reprimand;
469 (3) Suspend any license for a definite period or for an indefinite period in connection
470 with any condition which may be attached to the restoration of such license;
471 (4) Prohibit any applicant or licensee from allowing a person who previously was
472 involved in the management or control, as defined by rule, of any adult residential mental
- 19 -

25 LC 57 0270S
473 health program, community living arrangement, drug treatment and education program,
474 or narcotic treatment program which has had its license or application revoked or denied
475 within the past 12 months to be involved in the management or control of such program
476 or arrangement;
477 (5) Revoke any license;
478 (6) Impose a fine of up to $2,000.00 per day for each violation of a law, rule, regulation,
479 or formal order related to the initial or ongoing licensing of any applicant or licensee, up
480 to a total of $40,000.00; or
481 (7) Limit or restrict any license as the department deems necessary for the protection of
482 the public, including, but not limited to, restricting some or all services of or admissions
483 into an adult residential mental health program, community living arrangement, drug
484 treatment and education program, or narcotic treatment program for a time certain.
485 In taking any of the actions enumerated in this subsection, the department shall consider
486 the seriousness of the violation, including the circumstances, extent, and gravity of the
487 prohibited acts, and the hazard or potentional hazard created to the health or safety of the
488 public.
489 (c) The department may deny a license or otherwise restrict a license from any applicant
490 who has had a license denied, revoked, or suspended within one year of the date of an
491 application or who has transferred ownership or governing authority of an adult residential
492 mental health program, community living arrangement, drug treatment and education
493 program, or narcotic treatment program subject to regulation by the department within one
494 year of the date of a new application when such transfer was made in order to avert denial,
495 revocation, or suspension of a license or to avert the payment of fines assessed by the
496 department pursuant to this Code section.
497 (d) With regard to any contested case instituted by the department pursuant to this Code
498 section or other provisions of law which may now or hereafter authorize remedial or
499 disciplinary grounds and action, the department may, in its discretion, dispose of the action
- 20 -

25 LC 57 0270S
500 so instituted by settlement. In such cases, all parties, successors, and assigns to any
501 settlement agreement shall be bound by the terms specified therein, and violation thereof
502 by any applicant or licensee shall constitute grounds for any action enumerated in
503 subsection (b) of this Code section.
504 (e) The department shall have the authority to make public or private investigations or
505 examinations inside or outside of this state to determine whether the provisions of this
506 Code section or any other law, rule, regulation, or formal order relating to the licensing of
507 any adult residential mental health program, community living arrangement, drug treatment
508 and education program, or narcotic treatment program has been violated. Such
509 investigations may be initiated at any time, in the discretion of the department, and may
510 continue during the pendency of any action initiated by the department pursuant to
511 subsection (b) of this Code section.
512 (f) For the purpose of conducting any investigation, inspection, or survey, the department
513 shall have the authority to require the production of any books, records, papers, or other
514 information related to the initial or continued licensing of any adult residential mental
515 health program, community living arrangement, drug treatment and education program, or
516 narcotic treatment program.
517 (g) Pursuant to the investigation, inspection, and enforcement powers given to the
518 department by this Code section and other applicable laws, the department may assess
519 against an adult residential mental health program, community living arrangement, drug
520 treatment and education program, or narcotic treatment program reasonable and necessary
521 expenses incurred by the department pursuant to any administrative or legal action required
522 by the failure of such program or arrangement to fully comply with the provisions of any
523 law, rule, regulation, or formal order related to the initial or continued licensing.
524 Assessments shall not include attorney's fees and expenses of litigation, shall not exceed
525 other actual expenses, and shall only be assessed if such investigation, inspection, or
- 21 -

25 LC 57 0270S
526 enforcement actions result in adverse findings, as finally determined by the department,
527 pursuant to administrative or legal action.
528 (h) For any action taken or any proceeding held under this Code section or under color of
529 law, except for gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct, the department, when
530 acting in its official capacity, shall be immune from liability and suit to the same extent that
531 any judge of any court of general jurisdiction in this state would be immune.
532 (i) In an administrative or legal proceeding under this Code section, a person or entity
533 claiming an exemption or an exception granted by law, rule, regulation, or formal order has
534 the burden of proving such exemption or exception.
535 (j) This Code section and all actions resulting from its provisions shall be administered in
536 accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.'
537 (k) The provisions of this Code section shall be supplemental to and shall not operate to
538 prohibit the department from acting pursuant to any provisions of law which may now or
539 hereafter authorize remedial or disciplinary grounds and action for the department. In
540 cases where such other provisions of law so authorize other disciplinary grounds and
541 actions, but this Code section limits such grounds or actions, such other provisions shall
542 apply.
543 (l) The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the
544 provisions of this Code section.
545 37-2-73.
546 (a)(1) The commissioner may order the emergency relocation of residents from an adult
547 residential mental health program, community living arrangement, drug treatment and
548 education program, or narcotic treatment program subject to licensure by the department
549 when he or she has determined that the residents are subject to an imminent and
550 substantial danger.
551 (2) When an order is issued under this subsection, the commissioner shall provide for:
- 22 -

25 LC 57 0270S
552 (A) Notice to the resident and his or her next of kin or guardian of the emergency
553 relocation and the reasons therefor;
554 (B) Relocation to the nearest appropriate adult residential mental health program,
555 community living arrangement, drug treatment and education program, narcotic
556 treatment program, or other appropriate setting; and
557 (C) Other protection designed to ensure the welfare and, when possible, the desires of
558 the resident.
559 (b)(1) The commissioner may order the emergency placement of a monitor in an adult
560 residential mental health program, community living arrangement, drug treatment and
561 education program, or narcotic treatment program, subject to licensure by the department,
562 when one or more of the following conditions are present:
563 (A) The adult residential mental health program, community living arrangement, drug
564 treatment and education program, or narcotic treatment program is operating without
565 a permit or a license;
566 (B) The department has denied application for a permit or a license or has initiated
567 action to revoke the existing permit or license of the licensee;
568 (C) The adult residential mental health program, community living arrangement, drug
569 treatment and education program, or narcotic treatment program is closing or plans to
570 close and adequate arrangements for relocation of the residents have not been made at
571 least 30 days before the date of closure; or
572 (D) The health, safety, security, rights, or welfare of the residents cannot be adequately
573 assured by the adult residential mental health program, community living arrangement,
574 drug treatment and education program, or narcotic treatment program.
575 (2) A monitor may be placed, pursuant to this subsection, in an adult residential mental
576 health program, community living arrangement, drug treatment and education program,
577 or narcotic treatment program for no more than ten days, during which time the monitor
578 shall observe conditions and compliance with any recommended remedial action of the
- 23 -

25 LC 57 0270S
579 department. The monitor shall report to the department. The monitor shall not assume
580 any administrative responsibility within the adult residential mental health program,
581 community living arrangement, drug treatment and education program, or narcotic
582 treatment program, nor shall the monitor be liable for any actions of the licensee. The
583 costs of placing a monitor in an adult residential mental health program, community
584 living arrangement, drug treatment and education program, or narcotic treatment program
585 shall be paid by the licensee unless the order placing the monitor is determined to be
586 invalid in a contested case proceeding under subsection (d) of this Code section, in which
587 event, the costs shall be paid by the state.
588 (c)(1) The commissioner may order the emergency prohibition of admissions to an adult
589 residential mental health program, community living arrangement, drug treatment and
590 education program, or narcotic treatment program when such licensee has failed to
591 correct a violation of departmental permit rules or regulations within a reasonable period
592 of time, as specified in the department's corrective order, and the violation:
593 (A) Could jeopardize the health and safety of the residents if allowed to remain
594 uncorrected; or
595 (B) Is a repeat violation over a 12 month period, which is intentional or due to gross
596 negligence.
597 (2) Admission to new residents may be suspended until the violation has been corrected
598 or until the department has determined that the licensee has undertaken the action
599 necessary to effect correction of the violation.
600 (d) The commissioner may issue emergency orders pursuant to this Code section only if
601 authorized by rules and regulations of the department. Unless otherwise provided in any
602 such order, an emergency order shall become effective immediately. The department shall
603 provide an opportunity for a preliminary hearing within ten days following a request
604 therefor by any adult residential mental health program, community living arrangement,
605 drug treatment and education program, or narcotic treatment program affected by an
- 24 -

25 LC 57 0270S
606 emergency order. If, at the preliminary hearing, the order is determined by the department
607 to be invalid, such order shall thereupon become void and of no effect. If, at the
608 preliminary hearing, the order is determined by the department to be valid, such
609 determination shall constitute a contested case under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia
610 Administrative Procedure Act,' and such order shall remain in effect until determined
611 invalid in a proceeding regarding the contested case or until rescinded by the
612 commissioner, whichever is earlier. For purposes of this subsection, an emergency order
613 is valid only if the order is authorized to be issued under this Code section and rules and
614 regulations relating thereto.
615 (e) The powers provided by this Code section shall be in addition to all other powers of
616 the department, board, and commissioner."
617 SECTION 3-2.
618 Said title is further amended by revising paragraphs (1) and (3) of Code Section 37-3-202,
619 relating to definitions regarding adult residential mental health services licenses, as follows:
620 "(1) 'Adult residential mental health program' means a subacute residential alternative
621 service of four or more residential beds authorized to provide psychiatric services for
622 mentally ill persons 18 years of age or older that operates 24 hours per day, 7 days per
623 week to provide intensive short-term noninstitutional treatment to individuals who are
624 temporarily in need of a 24-hour-per-day supportive therapeutic setting for prevention of
625 or transition from or after acute psychiatric hospitalization. Such term shall not include
626 crisis stabilization units, as defined in Code Section 37-1-29; community living
627 arrangements, as defined by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental
628 Disabilities in Code Section 37-13-1; mental health programs conducted by
629 accountability courts; or residential beds operated by a state or local public entity."
630 "(3) 'Department' means the Department of Community Behavioral Health and
631 Developmental Disabilities."
- 25 -

25 LC 57 0270S
632 SECTION 3-3.
633 Said title is further amended by revising subsection (b) of Code Section 37-3-205, relating
634 to regulatory and licensing authority, as follows:
635 "(b) The department is further authorized to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses a
636 license or take other enforcement actions against licensees or applicants a licensee or
637 applicant as provided in Code Section 31-2-8 Article 3 of Chapter 2 of this title."
638 SECTION 3-4.
639 Said title is further amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 37-3-206, relating
640 to licensing requirements and funding contingency, as follows:
641 "(a) On and after July 1, 2025 January 1, 2026, no governing body shall operate an adult
642 residential mental health program without having a valid license or provisional license
643 issued pursuant to this article; provided, however, that hospitals licensed in accordance
644 with Chapter 7 of Title 31 are exempt from this article unless the hospital is operating an
645 adult residential mental health program that is separate and distinct from the licensed
646 hospital."
647 SECTION 3-5.
648 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 37-3-208.1, relating to one-time
649 provisional license, as follows:
650 "Between July 1, 2022, and June 30, 2025, December 31, 2025, the department Department
651 of Community Health shall be authorized to grant a one-time provisional license for an
652 adult residential mental health program to an existing licensed personal care home that
653 substantially complies with the requirements of this article for a period not to extend
654 beyond June 30, December 31, 2025."
- 26 -

25 LC 57 0270S
655 SECTION 3-6.
656 Said title is further amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 37-3-211, relating
657 to denial, suspension, or revocation of license, as follows:
658 "(a) The department is authorized to deny, suspend, or revoke a license issued under this
659 chapter for a violation of this chapter or a rule or regulation adopted under this chapter or
660 to take other disciplinary actions against licensees a licensee as provided in Code Section
661 31-2-8 Article 3 of Chapter 2 of this title."
662 SECTION 3-7.
663 Said title is further amended by revising subsections (a), (c), and (d) of Code Section
664 37-3-215, relating to unlicensed residential mental health program and penalty, as follows:
665 "(a) On and after July 1, 2025, January 1, 2026, a facility program shall be deemed to be
666 an 'unlicensed adult residential mental health program' if it is unlicensed and not exempt
667 from licensure under this article and:
668 (1) The facility program is providing services and is operating as an adult residential
669 mental health program;
670 (2) The facility program is held out as or represented as providing services and operating
671 as an adult residential mental health program; or
672 (3) The facility program represents itself as a licensed adult residential mental health
673 program."
674 "(c) In addition to other remedies available to the department, the civil penalty authorized
675 by subsection (b) of this Code section shall be doubled if the program owner or operator
676 continues to operate the unlicensed adult residential mental health program, after receipt
677 of notice pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.
678 (d) The program owner or operator of an unlicensed adult residential mental health
679 program who is assessed a civil penalty in accordance with this Code section may have
- 27 -

25 LC 57 0270S
680 review of such civil penalty by appeal such civil penalty to the superior court in the county
681 in which the action arose or to the Superior Court of Fulton County."
682 SECTION 3-8.
683 Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to crimes and offenses, is
684 amended by revising paragraphs (7) of Code Section 16-5-100, relating to definitions
685 relevant to protection of elder persons, as follows:
686 "(7) 'Long-term care facility' means any skilled nursing facility, intermediate care home,
687 assisted living community, community living arrangement, or personal care home subject
688 to regulation and licensure by the Department of Community Health and any community
689 living arrangement licensed by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental
690 Disabilities pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 13 of Title 37."
691 SECTION 3-9.
692 Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state government, is amended
693 by revising subsection (d) of Code Section 50-18-160, relating to individuals or nonprofit
694 organizations, as follows:
695 "(12) Collection and use of personal information as permitted by statute, rule, or
696 regulation for purposes of administration of programs and services, regulatory oversight,
697 and ensuring compliance by prospective and approved contractors:
698 (A) By the Department of Human Services for purposes authorized in Article 1 of
699 Chapter 2 of Title 49;
700 (B) By the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities for
701 purposes authorized in Chapter 5 of Title 26 and Title 37;
702 (C) By the Department of Community Health for purposes authorized in Chapter 5 of
703 Title 26, Title 31, Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 37, Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45,
704 Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49, or Article 7 of Chapter 6 of Title 49; and
- 28 -

25 LC 57 0270S
705 (D) By the Department of Juvenile Justice for purposes authorized in Chapter 4A of
706 Title 49."
707 PART IV
708 Community Living Arrangements
709 SECTION 4-1.
710 Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to mental health, is amended by
711 adding a new chapter to read as follows:
712 "CHAPTER 13
713 ARTICLE 1
714 37-13-1.
715 As used in this article, the term:
716 (1) 'Community living arrangement' means a group home that serves up to four
717 individuals with a developmental disability who require intense levels of residential
718 support and which services are financially supported, in whole or in part, by funds
719 authorized through the department and provides a range of interventions that focuses on
720 training and support in one or more of the following areas:
721 (A) Eating and drinking;
722 (B) Toileting;
723 (C) Personal grooming and healthcare;
724 (D) Dressing;
725 (E) Communication;
726 (F) Interpersonal relationships;
727 (G) Mobility;
728 (H) Home management; and
- 29 -

25 LC 57 0270S
729 (I) Use of leisure time.
730 (2) 'License' means the official permit issued by the department which authorizes the
731 holder to operate a community living arrangement for the term provided therein.
732 (3) 'Licensee' means any person holding a license issued by the department under this
733 article.
734 37-13-2.
735 (a) The department is authorized and directed to create and promulgate all rules and
736 regulations necessary for the implementation of this article; provided, however, that such
737 rules and regulations shall include physical plant health and safety standards, supplies,
738 services, staffing, admission agreements, resident rights, records, medications, nutrition,
739 discharge and transfer, and procedures addressing changes in condition or serious or
740 unusual incidents.
741 (b)(1) The department shall require a licensee to have a regularly rehearsed disaster
742 preparedness plan with which staff and residents shall comply in cases of emergent
743 events including, but not limited to, natural disasters, pandemics, fires, or interruption of
744 essential services such as a electrical power, heat, and water supply.
745 (2) Such disaster preparedness plan shall include written procedures with which staff
746 shall comply in the event of an emergency and shall include care of the resident,
747 notification of other individuals responsible for the resident, and plans for transportation,
748 alternative living arrangements or sheltering in place, emergency energy sources, or other
749 appropriate services.
750 (c) Any rule and regulation relating to community living arrangements created by the
751 Department of Community Health and in effect on December 31, 2025, shall continue to
752 be in effect and shall be enforceable by the department until such time as such rule or
753 regulation is amended or revoked by the department.
- 30 -

25 LC 57 0270S
754 37-13-3.
755 (a) No person, business entity, corporation, or association, whether operated for profit or
756 not for profit, may operate a community living arrangement without first obtaining a
757 license or provisional license issued by the department. A license issued by the department
758 is neither assignable nor transferable.
759 (b) Any license issued to a community living arrangement by the Department of
760 Community Health on December 31, 2025, shall be valid until renewed or revoked by the
761 department, surrendered by the licensee, or otherwise terminated.
762 37-13-4.
763 (a) The department shall be authorized to conduct periodic on-site inspections of any
764 licensee in this state.
765 (b) The department may accept proof of accreditation by a nationally recognized
766 healthcare accreditation body, in accordance with specific standards, as evidence of
767 compliance with one or more departmental requirements for issuance or renewal of a
768 license or provisional license.
769 (c) The department shall not be bound by any policy or practice of the Department of
770 Community Health in effect on December 31, 2025, in determining whether to issue a
771 license based on the findings of an accreditation agency pursuant to subsection (b) of this
772 Code section.
773 ARTICLE 2
774 37-13-20.
775 As used in this article, the term:
776 (1) 'Abuse' means any intentional or grossly negligent act or series of acts or intentional
777 or grossly negligent omission to act which causes injury to a resident, including, but not
- 31 -

25 LC 57 0270S
778 limited to, assault or battery, failure to provide treatment or care, or sexual harassment
779 of a resident.
780 (2) 'Community living arrangement' means any group home licensed by the department
781 pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter.
782 (3) 'Exploitation' means the illegal or improper use of a resident or a resident's resources
783 through undue influence, coercion, harassment, duress, deception, false representation,
784 false pretenses, or other similar means for one's own or another's profit or advantage.
785 (4) 'Resident' means any person receiving treatment or care in a community living
786 arrangement.
787 37-13-21.
788 (a) Any of the following persons who have reasonable cause to believe that a resident or
789 former resident has been abused or exploited while residing in a community living
790 arrangement shall immediately make a report as described in subsection (d) of this Code
791 section by telephone or in person to the department and to the appropriate law enforcement
792 agency or prosecuting attorney:
793 (1) Administrators, managers, or other employees of a community living arrangement;
794 (2) Physical therapists;
795 (3) Occupational therapists;
796 (4) Coroners;
797 (5) Medical examiners;
798 (6) Emergency medical services personnel, as such individuals are defined in Code
799 Section 31-11-49;
800 (7) Any person who is certified as an emergency medical technician, cardiac technician,
801 paramedic, or first responder pursuant to Chapter 11 of Title 31;
802 (8) Employees of a public or private agency engaged in professional health related
803 services to residents; and
- 32 -

25 LC 57 0270S
804 (9) Clergy members.
805 (b) Persons required to make a report pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall
806 also make a written report to the department within 24 hours after making the initial report.
807 (c) Any other person who has knowledge that a resident or former resident has been
808 abused or exploited while residing in a community living arrangement may report or cause
809 a report to be made to the department or the appropriate law enforcement agency.
810 (d) An initial report of suspected abuse or exploitation shall include the following:
811 (1) The name and address of the person making the report, unless such person is not
812 required to make a report pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section;
813 (2) The name and address of the resident or former resident for which abuse or
814 exploitation is suspected;
815 (3) The name and address of the community living arrangement;
816 (4) The name and extent of any known injuries or the condition relating to, or resulting
817 from, the suspected abuse or exploitation;
818 (5) The suspected cause of the abuse or exploitation; and
819 (6) Any other information which the reporter reasonably believes might be helpful in
820 determining the cause of the resident's or former resident's injuries or condition and in
821 determining the identity of the person or persons responsible for the suspected abuse or
822 exploitation.
823 (e) The department shall maintain accurate records which shall include all reports of
824 suspected abuse or exploitation, the results of all investigations and administrative or
825 judicial proceedings, and a summary of actions taken to assist the resident or former
826 resident.
827 (f) Any suspected abuse or exploitation which is required to be reported by any person
828 pursuant to this Code section shall be reported notwithstanding that the reasonable cause
829 to believe such abuse or exploitation has occurred or is occurring is based in whole or in
830 part upon any communication to that person which is otherwise made privileged or
- 33 -

25 LC 57 0270S
831 confidential by law; provided, however, that a member of the clergy shall not be required
832 to report such matters confided to him or her solely within the context of confession or
833 other similar communication required to be kept confidential under church doctrine or
834 practice. When a clergy member receives information about abuse or exploitation from
835 any other source, such clergy member shall comply with the reporting requirements of this
836 Code section, even though the clergy member may have also received a report of such
837 matters from the confession of the perpetrator.
838 37-13-22.
839 (a) Immediately after the receipt of any report of suspected abuse or exploitation, the
840 department shall make and document a determination as to whether such report requires
841 an investigation. The department may, through its rules, regulations, or policies, limit the
842 scope of any investigation and may delegate all or part of its authority to investigate to the
843 appropriate law enforcement agency or other appropriate investigating agencies. If such
844 delegation occurs, the agency to which authority has been delegated shall report the results
845 of its investigation to the department immediately upon completion of such investigation.
846 (b) The investigation shall determine the nature, cause, and extent of the suspected abuse
847 or exploitation reported, an assessment of the current condition of the resident or former
848 resident, and an assessment of any needed action or service. Where appropriate, the
849 investigation shall include a prompt in-person visit to the resident or former resident.
850 (c) The investigating agency shall collect and preserve all evidence relating to, or resulting
851 from, the suspected abuse or exploitation.
852 (d) All state, county, and municipal law enforcement agencies, employees of community
853 living arrangements, and other appropriate persons shall cooperate with the department or
854 investigating agency in the administration of this article.
855 37-13-23.
- 34 -

25 LC 57 0270S
856 (a) Upon the receipt of the results of an investigation conducted pursuant to Code Section
857 37-13-22, the department, in cooperation with the investigating agency, shall immediately
858 evaluate such results to determine what actions, if any, shall be taken to assist the resident
859 or former resident.
860 (b) The department or agency designated by the department shall assist to prevent further
861 harm to a resident or former resident who has been abused or exploited. The department
862 may also take appropriate legal actions to assure the safety and welfare of all other
863 residents of the community living arrangement where necessary.
864 (c) Within a reasonable time, not to exceed 30 days, after it has initiated action to assist
865 a resident or former resident, the department shall determine the current condition of the
866 resident or former resident, whether the abuse or exploitation has been abated, and whether
867 continued assistance is necessary.
868 (d) If, as a result of any investigation pursuant to this article, a determination is made that
869 a resident or former resident has been abused or exploited, the department shall contact the
870 appropriate prosecuting authority and provide all information and evidence to such
871 prosecuting authority.
872 37-13-24.
873 (a) Any agency or person who in good faith makes a report or provides information or
874 evidence pursuant to this article shall be immune from liability for such actions.
875 (b) Neither the department nor its employees, when acting in good faith and with
876 reasonable diligence, shall have any liability for defamation, invasion of privacy,
877 negligence, or any other claim in connection with the collection or release of information
878 pursuant to this article and neither shall be subject to suit based upon any such claims.
879 37-13-25.
- 35 -

25 LC 57 0270S
880 The identities of the resident or former resident, the alleged perpetrator, and the person or
881 persons making a report or providing information or evidence pursuant to this article shall
882 not be disclosed to the public unless required to be revealed in court proceedings or upon
883 the written consent of the person whose identity is to be revealed or as otherwise required
884 by law. Upon the resident's or the former resident's, or his or her representative's, request,
885 the department shall make information obtained in an abuse or exploitation report and
886 investigation available to the allegedly abused or exploited resident, the allegedly abused
887 or exploited former resident, or his or her representative for inspection or duplication,
888 except that such disclosure shall be made without revealing the identity of any other
889 resident, the person making the report, or persons providing information by name or
890 inference. For the purpose of this Code section, the term 'representative' means any person
891 authorized in writing by the resident or former resident or appointed by an appropriate
892 court to act upon the resident's or former resident's behalf. The term 'representative' also
893 means a family member of a deceased or physically or mentally impaired resident or
894 former resident unable to grant authorization; provided, however, that such family
895 members who do not have written or court authorization shall not be authorized by this
896 Code section to receive the resident's or former resident's clinical records as defined in
897 Code Section 37-3-1, 37-4-2, or 37-7-1. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed
898 to deny agencies participating in joint investigations at the request of and with the
899 department, or conducting separate investigations of abuse or exploitation within an
900 agency's scope of authority, or law enforcement personnel who are conducting an
901 investigation into any criminal offense in which a resident or former resident is a victim
902 from having access to such records.
903 37-13-26.
904 No person or community living arrangement shall discriminate or retaliate in any manner
905 against any person for making a report or providing information pursuant to this article or
- 36 -

25 LC 57 0270S
906 against any resident or former resident who is the subject of a report. Nothing in this Code
907 section shall be construed to prohibit the termination of the relationship between the
908 community living arrangement and the resident for reasons other than that the community
909 living arrangement has been made the subject of a report, that such a report has been made,
910 or that information has been provided pursuant to this article.
911 37-13-27.
912 The department shall prepare a written notice describing the reporting requirements set
913 forth in this article. Such notice shall be distributed to all community living arrangements
914 in this state, and copies thereof shall be posted in conspicuous locations within community
915 living arrangements."
916 PART V
917 Effective date
918 SECTION 5-1.
919 This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
920 PART VI
921 Repealer
922 SECTION 6-1.
923 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 37 -